Nebraska, session 109, LB803A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $1,110,157 from the General
Fund for FY2026-27 and (2) $986,400 from the General Fund for FY2027-28 to the
Department of Revenue, for Program 102, to aid in carrying out the provisions
of Legislative Bill 803, One Hundred Ninth Legislature, Second Session, 2026.
Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems from
funds appropriated in this section shall not exceed $81,300 for FY2026-27 or
$83,800 for FY2027-28.
Sec. 2. There is hereby appropriated (1) $177,711 from the General Fund
for FY2026-27 and (2) $17,383 from the General Fund for FY2027-28 to the
Department of Revenue, for Program 112, to aid in carrying out the provisions
of Legislative Bill 803, One Hundred Ninth Legislature, Second Session, 2026.
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems for
state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this section.
Sec. 3. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-1-